Colorado, session 2026A, SB055.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
Shading denotes HOUSE amendment. Double underlining denotes SENATE amendment.
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material to be added to existing law.
Dashes through the words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law.

SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add part 5 to article
63 of title 22 as follows:
PART 5
SCHOOL PERSONNEL DISCIPLINARY RECORDS REGISTRY
22-63-501. Creation of centralized registry - definitions.
(1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "ADMINISTRATOR" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION
22-63-103.
(b) "MISCONDUCT" MEANS ANY ACTION THAT WOULD VIOLATE THE
SCHOOL DISTRICT'S CONDUCT AND DISCIPLINE CODE APPLICABLE TO
SCHOOL PERSONNEL OR AN EMPLOYEE'S CONTRACT.
(c) "PUBLIC SCHOOL" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION
22-1-101.
(d) "REGISTRY" MEANS THE COMPUTERIZED CENTRAL REGISTRY OF
SCHOOL PERSONNEL IN PUBLIC SCHOOLS WITH DISCIPLINARY RECORDS, AS
DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION.
(e) "SCHOOL DISTRICT" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION
22-55.5-102.
(f) "SCHOOL PERSONNEL" MEANS TEACHERS, ADMINISTRATORS,
SCHOOL RESOURCE OFFICERS, AND OTHER EMPLOYEES OF A SCHOOL.
(2) (a) THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION SHALL CREATE AND
MAINTAIN A COMPUTERIZED CENTRAL REGISTRY OF EACH DISCIPLINARY
RECORD OF SCHOOL PERSONNEL'S FOUND MISCONDUCT.
(b) A SCHOOL SHALL REGISTER ANY SCHOOL PERSONNEL,
PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION, WITHIN THIRTY DAYS AFTER DISCIPLINING
THE SCHOOL PERSONNEL FOR CONDUCT DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (2)(a)
-2- SB26-055

OF THIS SECTION. TO REGISTER SCHOOL PERSONNEL, THE SCHOOL SHALL
SUBMIT TO THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION THE INFORMATION ABOUT
THE SCHOOL PERSONNEL DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (2)(c) OF THIS
SECTION.
(c) THE REGISTRY MUST INCLUDE, AT MINIMUM, THE FOLLOWING
INFORMATION:
(I) THE NAME OF THE SCHOOL PERSONNEL;
(II) THE SCHOOL PERSONNEL'S DATE OF BIRTH;
(III) THE SCHOOL DISTRICT IN WHICH THE SCHOOL PERSONNEL WAS
OR REMAINS EMPLOYED; AND
(IV) ANY PERTINENT DISCIPLINARY RECORD.
(d) THE REGISTRY IS ONLY ACCESSIBLE TO ADMINISTRATORS, AND
THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION SHALL PROHIBIT A PERSON WHO IS NOT
AN ADMINISTRATOR FROM ACCESSING THE INFORMATION IN THE REGISTRY.
(e) THE REGISTRY MUST INCLUDE THE RELEVANT INFORMATION
FROM EVERY SCHOOL DISTRICT WITHIN THE STATE.
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-3- SB26-055